en: calf fat
bg: телешка мазнина
de: Kalbsfett, Kalbfett
fi: vasikanrasva
fr: gras de veau
hr: teleća mast
hu: borjúzsír
it: grasso di vitello
nl: kalfsvet

en: beef fat
bg: говежда мазнина
ca: greix de bou
da: oksefedt
de: Rinderfett
es: Grasa de vacuno, grasa bovina, grasa vacuna
fi: naudanrasva
fr: gras de bœuf, graisse de bœuf, gras de bovin, bovin
hr: goveđi mast
hu: marhazsír
it: grasso di manzo
nb: oksekjøttfett
nl: rundvet, rundervet
pl: tłuszcz wołowy, tłuszcze wołowe
sv: nötköttsfett

en: Wagyu-fat
hr: wagyu-mast

en: beef suet
de: Rindernierenfett
hr: govedi loj, goveđi loj, goveđi loja

en: milkfat, milk fat
bg: млечна мазнина, млечни мазнини
bs: mlečna mast
cs: mléčný tuk
da: mælkefedt
de: Milchfett
es: materia grasa láctea, grasa de leche, grasa lactea, grasa láctea anhidra, materia grasa lactea anhidra
et: piimarasv
fi: maitorasva
fr: matière grasse lactique, matière grasse laitière, matière grasse de lait, matière grasse du lait
hr: mlijecnu mast, mliječna mast, mliječne masti, mliječne masti
hu: tejzsír
is: mjólkurfita
it: grasso del latte, grasso di latte
lt: pieno riebalai
lv: piena tauki
nb: melkefett
nl: melkvet
pl: tłuszcz mleczny, tłuszcz z mleka
pt: gorda do leite
ro: grasimi din lapte, grăsimi din lapte, grasime din lapte, grăsime din lapte
sk: mliečny tuk
sv: mjölkfett
tr: süt yağı, sütyağı

en: milk fat without lactose
hr: mliječne masti bez laktoze
it: grasso del latte senza lattosio
mk: млечна маст без лактоза

en: butterfat, butter fat, pastry butter, anhydrous milk fat, concentrated butter, concentrated dairy butter, butter oil, anhydrous butter
bg: безводно масло
bs: mliječna mast
cy: braster menyn
da: smørfedt, smørolie
de: Butterreinfett, wasserfreies Milchfett
el: βούτυρο τηγμένο
eo: laktograso
es: grasa butírica, mantequilla concentrada, mantequilla anhidra
et: võirasv, veevaba piimarasv
fi: voiöljy, voirasva, tiivistetty voi, vedetön maitorasva
fr: matière grasse butyrique, graisse butyrique, beurre purifié, beurre fondu, beurre pâtissier, matière grasse laitière anhydre, beurre laitier concentré, beurre concentré, beurre anhydre, huile butyrique
hr: pročišćeni maslac, bezvodna mliječna mast
hu: vajzsír, vajolaj, derített vaj
id: lemak susu
it: burro anidro, burro di pasticceria, burro concentrato
ja: 乳脂肪, バターオイル
ko: 유지방
ms: lemak mentega, lemak susu
nb: vannfritt melkefett
nl: boterconcentraat, botervet, watervrij melkvet, boterolie, geconcentreerde boter
pl: bezwodny tłuszcz mleczny
pt: gordura butrica, lípido butrica, matéria gorda butírica, manteiga concentrada, gordura de leite anhidra, lípido de leite anhidra
ro: grasimi din unt, grăsime din unt, ulei de unt
ru: Молочный жир, топленое масло, жир-молочный
sl: mlečna maščoba
sr: anhidrovana mlečna
sv: smörfett, smörolja, koncentrerat smör, vattenfritt mjölkfett
th: ไขมันเนย
tl: taba ng gatas
uk: Молочний жир
zh: 乳脂

en: clarified butter
ar: عدل
ca: mantega clarificada
cs: přepuštěné máslo
de: Butterschmalz, geklärte Butter
es: mantequilla clarificada
fi: kirkastettu voi
fr: beurre clarifié
he: חמאה מזוקקת
hu: tisztított vaj
it: burro chiarificato, burro fuso
ja: 澄ましバター
kk: Сары май
ko: 버터기름
ky: Сары май
lt: lydytas sviestas
ms: mentega jernihan
nl: geklaarde boter
os: Царв
pl: masło klarowane
pt: manteiga clarificada
ru: Топлёное масло
sq: gjalpi i kthjelluar
th: เนยใส
uk: Пряжене масло
zh: 无水黄油

en: clarified cow's butter
de: geklärte Kuhmilchbutter
hr: pročišćeni kravlji maslac

en: ghee
ar: سمن حيواني
az: sarı yağ
bg: гхи
bn: ঘি
cs: ghí
da: ghee
de: ghee
dv: ދަހީ
eo: gio
es: ghee
fa: روغن کرمانشاهی
fi: ghi, ghee
fr: ghi, ghee, huile de beurre
ga: gí
gu: ઘી
he: גהי
hi: घी
hr: ghee
hu: ghí, ghí vaj
id: minyak samin
is: skírt smjör
it: ghi
ja: ギー
ka: ერბო
kn: ತುಪ್ಪ
ko: 기
lt: ghi
ml: നെയ്യ്
mr: तूप
ms: minyak sapi
nb: ghi, ghee
ne: घिउ
nl: ghee, ghi
nn: ghi, ghee
pa: ਘਿਉ
pl: ghi, ghee
pt: ghi, ghee
ro: ghee
ru: Гхи
sa: घृतम्
si: ගිතෙල්
sl: ghee
sv: ghee
ta: நெய்
te: నెయ్యి
uk: Ґгі, Гхі, Ґі
ur: گھی
zh: 酥油

en: vegetable oil, vegetal oil, vegetal oils, vegetable oils, plant oils
af: Plantaardige olie
ar: زيت نباتي
az: Bitki yağı
be: Алеі
bg: Растително масло, растителни масла, растително олио, растителни масла и олио
bs: biljno ulje
ca: Oli vegetal
cs: Rostlinný olej, rostlinné oleje
da: vegetabilsk olie, vegetabilisk olie, vegetabilske olier
de: Pflanzenöle, pflanzliche Öle, pflanzliches Öl, Pflanzenöl
el: Φυτικό λάδι, φυτικά έλαια, έλαια από φυτά
eo: Legoma oleo
es: Aceite vegetal, aceites vegetales
et: Taimeõli, taimne õli, taimsed õlid
eu: Landare-olio
fa: دانه‌های روغنی
fi: kasviöljy, kasviöljyt, kasviöljyjä
fr: huile végétale, huiles végétales, huiles végétale, huile végétales
gl: Aceite vexetal
he: שמן מן הצומח
hi: वनस्पति तेल
hr: biljno ulje, biljna ulja, ulje biljno
hu: növényi olaj, növényi olajak
id: Minyak nabati
is: Grænmetisolía
it: Olio vegetale, oli vegetali
ja: 植物油
ko: 식물성 기름
ky: Өсүмдүк майлары
lt: augaliniai aliejai
lv: augu eļļas
ml: സസ്യ എണ്ണകൾ
mr: वनस्पती तूप
ms: Minyak sayur
nb: vegetabilsk olje, vegetabilisk olje
nl: plantaardige olie, Spijsolie, plantaardige olien
nn: vegetabilisk olie
pl: Olej roślinny, oleje roślinne
pt: Óleo vegetal, óleos vegetais
ro: Ulei vegetal, uleiuri vegetale
ru: Растительные масла, масла растительные, масла растительные рафинированные дезодорированные, масло растительное, растительное масло, рафинированные дезодорированные масла в натуральном и модифицированном виде, рафинированные дезодорированные растительные масла, рафинированные дезодорированные растительные масла в натуральном и модифицированном виде, рафинированные дезодорированные растительные масла в натуральном и отвержденном виде
sh: Biljno ulje
sl: Rastlinska olja
sr: Биљно уље
sv: vegetabilisk olja, vegetabiliska oljor
th: น้ำมันพืช
tr: Bitkisel yağ
uk: Рослинні жири й олії
vi: Dầu thực vật
zh: 植物油

en: vegetable oil blend
fr: mélanges des huiles végétales
hr: mješavina biljnog ulja
it: miscela di oli vegetali

en: vegetable fat, vegetal fat, vegetable fats
bg: растителна мазнина, растителни мазнини
ca: Greixos vegetals
cs: rostlinný tuk, rostlinné tuky
da: vegetabilsk fedt
de: pflanzliche Fette, pflanzliches Fett, pflanzenfett
el: φυτικά λίπη
es: grasas vegetales, grasa vegetal, grasa vegetal no hidrogenada, Manteca vegetal
et: taimne rasv, taimsed rasvad
fi: kasvirasva, kasvirasvat, kasvisrasva, kasvisrasvat, kasvisrasvoja, kasvirasvoja, kasvisrasvasta
fr: matière grasse végétale, matières grasses végétales, matière grasse végétale, graisse végétale, graisses végétales, graisse végétale
he: שמנים צמחיים, שמן צמחי, שומן צמחי, שומן מן הצומח
hr: biljna mast, biljne masti, biljne mast, biljne masnoće, biljna masnoća
hu: növényi zsír, növényi zsírok
is: jurtafeiti, jurtafeta
it: grasso vegetale, grassi vegetali, Grasso alimentare vegetale
ja: 植物性脂肪
lt: augaliniai riebalai
lv: augu tauki
nb: vegetabilsk fett, vegetabilskt fett
nl: plantaardige vetten, plantaardig vet
nn: vegetabilisk fett
no: vegetabilst felt
pl: tłuszcz roślinny, tłuszcze roślinne
pt: gordura vegetal, gorduras vegetais, lípido vegetal, lípidos vegetais, matérias gordas vegetais
ro: grăsime vegetală, grăsimi vegetale
ru: растительные жиры, жир растительный, растительный-жир
sk: rastlinný tuk
sl: rastlinska maščoba, rastlinska mast
sq: yndyrë bimore
sv: vegetabiliska fetter, vegetabiliskt fett, vegetabilsk fett, vegetabilisk fett
uk: жир рослинний

en: vegetable suet
de: vegetarisches Suet
hr: loj od povrća

en: non hydrogenated vegetable suet
de: ungehärteter vegetarischer Suet
hr: nehidrogenizirani biljni loj

en: vegetable stearin, vegetables stearins, vegetable stearic acid
de: Pflanzenstearin, pflanzliches Stearin
es: estearina vegetal
fr: stéarines végétales, stéarine végétales
it: stearina vegetale
nl: plantaardige stearine

fr: préparation de matières grasses végétales
fi: kasvirasvavalmiste
sv: vegetabilisk fettprodukt

en: non hydrogenated vegetable oil and fat, non hydrogenated vegetable oils and fats, vegetable oils and fats non hydrogenated
bg: нехидрогенирани растителни масла и мазнини
de: ungehärtete Pflanzenfette und Pflanzenöle, nicht hydrierte pflanzliche Fette und Öle
el: μη υδρογονωμένα φυτικά λίπη και έλαια
fi: kovettamaton kasviöljy ja -rasva, hydrogenoimaton kasviöljy ja -rasva
fr: graisse et huile végétale non hydrogénée, huiles et graisses végétales non hydrogénées
hr: nehidrogenizirano biljno ulje i mast
it: Olio e grasso vegetale non idrogenato

en: hydrogenated vegetable fat
bg: хидрогенирана растителна мазнина, хидрогенирани растителни мазнинини
da: hærdet vegetabilsk fedt
de: gehärtetes Pflanzenfett
es: Grasa vegetal hidrogenada
fi: kovetettu kasvirasva, hydrogenoitu kasvirasva
fr: graisse végétale hydrogénée, matière grasse végétale hydrogénée, graisses végétales hydrogénées
hu: hidrogénezett növényi zsír
it: Grasso vegetale idrogenato
pt: gordura vegetal hidrogenada, lípido vegetal hidrogenada
sv: härdat vegetabiliskt fett

en: fully hydrogenated vegetable fat
bg: напълно хидрогенирана растителна мазнина, растително напълно хидрогенирано масло
da: helt hærdet vegetabilsk fedt
de: komplett hydriertes Pflanzenfett
es: grasa vegetal totalmente hidrogenada, grasa vegetal fraccionada y totalmente hidrogenada
fi: kokonaan kovetettu kasvirasva, kokonaan hydrogenoitu kasvirasva
fr: graisse végétale totalement hydrogénée, matières graisses végétales totalement hydrogénées
hu: teljesen hidrogénezett növényi zsír
it: grassi vegetali totalmente idrogenati
nl: volledig gehydrogeneerde plantaardig vet, geheel gehard plantaardige vet